test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-Clex_riges_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Adjective - riges: # MLO, checked
    riges+A+Attr: riges
    riges+A+Sg+Nom: riges
    riges+A+Sg+Gen: riggá
    riges+A+Sg+Acc: riggá
    riges+A+Sg+Ill: riggás
    riges+A+Sg+Loc: riggást
    riges+A+Sg+Com: riggáin
    riges+A+Sg+Abe: riggáttáá
    riges+A+Ess: rigesin
    riges+A+Par: rigesid
    riges+A+Pl+Nom: riggáh
    riges+A+Pl+Gen: riggái
    riges+A+Pl+Acc: riggáid
    riges+A+Pl+Ill: riggáid
    riges+A+Pl+Loc: riggáin
    riges+A+Pl+Com: [riggáiguin, riggáigijn]
    riges+A+Pl+Abe: riggáittáá

    riges+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: riggásub
    riges+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Gen: riggásub
    riges+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Acc: riggásub
    riges+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Ill: riggásuubon
    riges+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Loc: riggásubboost
    riges+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Com: riggásubboin
    riges+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Abe: riggásubttáá
    riges+A+Der/Comp+A+Ess: riggásubbon
    riges+A+Der/Comp+A+Par: riggásubbod
    riges+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Nom: riggásuboh
    riges+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Gen: riggásuboi
    riges+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: riggásuboid
    riges+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Ill: riggásubboid
    riges+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Loc: riggásuboin
    riges+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Com: [riggásuboiguin, riggásuboigijn]
    riges+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Abe: riggásuboittáá

    riges+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: riggásumos
    riges+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Gen: riggásumos
    riges+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Acc: riggásumos
    riges+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Ill: riggásumosân
    riges+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Loc: riggásumosist
    riges+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Com: riggásumosáin
    riges+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Abe: riggásumosttáá
    riges+A+Der/Superl+A+Ess: riggásumosin
    riges+A+Der/Superl+A+Par: riggásumosid
    riges+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Nom: riggásumoseh
    riges+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Gen: riggásumosij
    riges+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Acc: riggásumosijd
    riges+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Ill: riggásumosáid
    riges+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Loc: riggásumosijn
    riges+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Com: [riggásumosijguin, riggásumosijgijn]
    riges+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Abe: riggásumosijttáá
